Florida, session 2026, SB1082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 13 408.7057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 408.7057âStatewide provider and health plan claim dispute 15 resolution program.â 16 (2) 17 (b)âThe resolution organization shall review claim disputes 18 filed by contracted and noncontracted providers and health plans 19 unless the disputed claim: 20 1.âIs related to interest payment; 21 2.âDoes not meet the jurisdictional amounts or the methods 22 of aggregation established by agency rule, as provided in 23 paragraph (a); 24 3.âIs part of an internal grievance in a Medicare managed 25 care organization or a reconsideration appeal through the 26 Medicare appeals process; 27 4.âIs related to a health plan that is not regulated by the 28 state; 29 5.âIs part of a Medicaid fair hearing pursued under 42 30 C.F.R. ss. 431.220 et seq.; 31 6.âIs the basis for an action pending in state or federal 32 court; or 33 7.âIs subject to a binding claim-dispute-resolution process 34 provided by contract entered into prior to October 1, 2000, 35 between the provider and the managed care organization; 36 8.âIs related to services initiated pursuant to s. 395.1041 37 or 42 U.S.C. s. 1395dd and has been submitted and meets the 38 criteria for resolution through the federal independent dispute 39 resolution process; or 40 9.âIs related to services rendered by out-of-network 41 providers and has been submitted and meets the criteria for 42 resolution through the federal independent dispute resolution 43 process. 44 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.